Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 804.32 Warrant resolution clinics prohibited. 1. As used in this section, âwarrant resolution clinicâ means a prearranged, formal or informal, advertised event designed to allow individuals with outstanding arrest warrants to appear and resolve such warrants without being subject to immediate arrest and custodial processing. 2. An entity, organization, county attorney, law enforcement agency, judicial officer, nonprofit organization, or any other person shall not organize, sponsor, host, fund, promote, or participate in a warrant resolution clinic. House File 2787, p. 2 3. A person who has an outstanding warrant for the personâs arrest shall only resolve such warrant by any of the following: a. Surrendering to a peace officer or at a law enforcement agency. b. Appearing at a scheduled court hearing as directed by a magistrate or judge under standard judicial procedures. c. Through a written or oral motion made in an individual, pending case, with notice provided to the prosecuting attorney, and ruled on by the court under standard judicial procedures in the ordinary course of the case, and not as part of any event, program, or arrangement prohibited by this section. 4. The use of public funds or facilities for the purpose of hosting a warrant resolution clinic is strictly prohibited. 5. A person shall not evade or attempt to evade the prohibitions of this section by conducting a substantially equivalent program, event, or arrangement under a different name, structure, or designation. A program, event, or arrangement is substantially equivalent if its primary purpose or practical effect is to allow individuals with outstanding arrest warrants to appear and resolve those warrants without being subject to immediate arrest and custodial processing. Evidence that a program is substantially equivalent includes but is not limited to: a. Block-scheduling or clustering warrant cases on a single docket day with an explicit or implicit understanding that attending individuals will not be subject to immediate arrest. b. Advertising or communicating to individuals with outstanding warrants that they may appear at a particular time and place to resolve warrants without risk of arrest. c. Coordinating between law enforcement, court personnel, attorneys, or community organizations to facilitate noncustodial warrant resolution outside of standard judicial procedures. 6. A violation of this section is subject to the following penalties: a. (1) A public official or employee who knowingly violates this section commits a simple misdemeanor. (2) In addition to the penalty provided in subparagraph (1), a public official or employee who knowingly violates this House File 2787, p. 3 section is also subject to removal from office or employment pursuant to applicable law. b. A private person that knowingly organizes, sponsors, hosts, or funds a warrant resolution clinic or substantially equivalent program in violation of this section commits a simple misdemeanor and is also subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per violation, recoverable by the attorney general in an action in district court. 7. Any person may report a suspected violation of this section to the office of the attorney general. Upon receipt of a report or upon the attorney generalâs own initiative, the attorney general may investigate suspected violations and may bring a civil enforcement action in district court seeking injunctive relief, civil penalties as provided in subsection 6, and recovery of costs and reasonable attorney fees. The attorney general shall establish a procedure for receiving and reviewing reports under this subsection and shall make such procedure publicly available. 8. Any resident of a county in which a warrant resolution clinic or substantially equivalent program is conducted or planned in violation of this section may bring a civil action in district court to do any of the following: a. Obtain injunctive or declaratory relief to prevent or restrain the violation. b. Recover actual damages, if any. c. Recover reasonable attorney fees and court costs if the plaintiff substantially prevails. 9. In addition to any other penalty, any county organizing, sponsoring, hosting, funding, promoting, or participating in a warrant resolution clinic shall not receive any funds having their origin in court debt, as defined in section 602.8107, including but not limited to fees or remittances arising from or related to the collection of past due fines and fees constituting court debt. 10. This section preempts and supersedes any ordinance, resolution, policy, rule, or other action by a city, county, or other political subdivision of this state that authorizes, permits, funds, or facilitates a warrant resolution clinic or any substantially equivalent program, event, or arrangement as House File 2787, p. 4 described in this section. No political subdivision of this state shall enact or enforce any provision that conflicts with or purports to authorize conduct prohibited by this section. Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2787, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor